Hawaii statutes.
§425-9 Statement of dissolution. Whenever
a domestic general partnership is dissolved, and the business is not continued,
a statement thereof showing the cause of dissolution shall be filed in the
office of the director of commerce and consumer affairs within thirty days
after the dissolution. The statement shall be certified by at least one
partner who shall certify that the dissolution was approved by all of the
partners. [L 1969, c 247, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 270, §4; am L 1982, c 204, §8;
am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1999, c 284, §3; am L 2003, c 124, §49]

Case Notes

Assignment of partnership interest operates as dissolution of
partnership. 1 H. 121. Sale by one of the partners of that partner's interest
dissolves partnership. 6 H. 162.

Agreement as to accounting on winding up partnership. 4 H.
553.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next